Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325D.485] OFFER OF ARBITRATION; TIMING; SEPARATE AGREEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Arbitration agreement" or "agreement to arbitrate" means a clause or contract that limits a party's ability to resolve disputes through a court, jury trial, or class action. new text end new text begin (c) "Clear and conspicuous" has the meaning given in section 325G.56, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (d) "Consumer" means an individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, a good or service for any purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Timing of offer; separate agreement. new text end new text begin A person must not require a consumer to enter into an arbitration agreement before or during the sale of a good or service. A person may enter into an arbitration agreement with a consumer after the sale of a good or service if the agreement to arbitrate is clear and conspicuous and separate from other general terms related to the sale of the good or service. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Void provisions. new text end new text begin The following provisions are contrary to public policy and are void and unenforceable: new text end new text begin (1) an agreement or provision of an agreement that violates subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) a waiver of the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin A provision of an agreement that violates this section must be severed from the other provisions of the agreement to the extent that the provision is void and unenforceable. The fact that the provision is void and unenforceable does not affect the other provisions of the agreement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to agreements executed on or after that date. new text end